District of Columbia statutes.
2-272.03

Budget.

The Mayor shall provide in the annual budget request to the Council funding for the Office of Public-Private Partnership represented as a separate line or responsibility center.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 104, 62 DCR 261